zh-TW: 布料裁切形式: 帶/條狀 (長形掛飾); 整疋; 依碼/公尺計; 布片; 預先裁切塊; 整捲; 其他
pl: Format cięcia tkaniny: Pasek/taśma (do tasiemek); Bela; Na metry/jardy; Panel; Gotowy wykrój; Rolka; Inny
sk-SK: Formát strihu látky: Pás/stuha (na gobelín); Návin; Na yardy/metre; Panel; Predstrihnutý kus; Rolka; Iné
pt-BR: Formato de corte de tecido: Faixa/tira (cordão de campainha); Peça de tecido; Por jarda/metro; Painel; Peça pré-cortada; Rolo; Outros
de: Format des Stoffzuschnitts: Band/Streifen (Klingelzug); Stoffballen; Pro Yard/Meter; Panel; Vorgeschnittenes Stück; Rolle; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Formato de corte de tecido: Faixa/tira (puxador de sino); Peça; Por jarda/metro; Painel; Peça pré-cortada; Rolo; Outro
ru: Формат раскроя ткани: Лента/полоса (для подвески); Штука; Метражом/ярдами; Купон; Готовый отрез; Рулон; Другое
da: Stofskåret format: Bånd/strimmel (klokkestreng); Stofrulle; Pr. yard/meter; Panel; Forudskåret stykke; Rulle; Andet
hu: Szövetvágási formátum: Pánt/szalag (haranghúzó); Vég; Yardonként/méterenként; Panel; Előre vágott darab; Tekercs; Egyéb
nl: Stof snijvorm: Band/strook (schellekoord); Stofrol; Per yard/meter; Paneel; Voorgesneden stuk; Rol; Overig
el: Μορφή κοπής υφάσματος: Λωρίδα/ταινία (bellpull); Τόπι; Με τη γιάρδα/το μέτρο; Πάνελ; Προκομμένο κομμάτι; Ρολό; Άλλο
lt-LT: Audinio kirpimo formatas: Juosta / juostelė („bellpull“); Rietimas; Jardais / metrais; Panelė; Iš anksto atkirptas gabalas; Rulonas; Kita
th: รูปแบบการตัดผ้า: แถบ/เส้น (ที่ดึงกระดิ่ง); ม้วนพับ; ทีละหลา/เมตร; แผ่น; ชิ้นที่ตัดไว้แล้ว; ม้วน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 面料裁剪形式: 带/条状（铃铛绳）; 匹; 按码/米; 裁片; 预裁剪件; 卷; 其他
sl-SI: Format rezane tkanine: Trak/pas (zvončnica); Bala; Na jard/meter; Panel; Vnaprej odrezan kos; Rola; Drugo
sv: Tygskärformat: Band/remsa (klocksträng); Tygbal; Per yard/meter; Panel; Färdigklippt bit; Rulle; Övrigt
nb: Stoffkuttformat: Bånd/strimmel (klokkestreng); Stoffrull; Per yard/meter; Panel; Ferdigklippet stykke; Rull; Annet
bg-BG: Формат на изрязване на плат: Лента/ивица (връв за камбанка); Топ; На ярд/метър; Панел; Предварително отрязано парче; Ролка; Други
ro-RO: Formatul tăiat al materialului textil: Bandă/fâșie (tip clopot); Val; La yard/metru; Panou; Bucată pretăiată; Rolă; Altele
it: formato di taglio del tessuto: Banda/striscia (per tirete); Pezza; Al metro/iarda; Pannello; Pezzo pretagliato; Rotolo; Altro
ko: 원단 재단 형식: 밴드/스트립(벨풀); 볼트; 야드/미터 단위; 패널; 사전 재단 조각; 롤; 기타
ja: 生地の裁断フォーマット: バンド/ストリップ (ベルプル); 反物; ヤード/メートル単位; パネル; プレカット生地; ロール; その他
hr-HR: Format rezanog materijala: Traka/vrpca (za povlačenje zvona); Bala; Na jard/metar; Ploča; Unaprijed odrezani komad; Rola; Ostalo
fr: Format de découpe du tissu: Bande/ruban (tirant); Rouleau; Au yard/mètre; Panneau; Pièce prédécoupée; Rouleau; Autre
cs: Formát střihu látky: Pás/pruh (závěs); Návin; Na yardy/metry; Panel; Předem nastříhaný kus; Role; Jiné
es: Formato de corte de tela: Banda/tira (campana); Rollo de tela (bolt); Por yarda/metro; Panel; Pieza precortada; Rollo; Otro
fi: Kankaan leikkausmuoto: Nauha/kaistale (kellonvetonauha); Pakka; Jaardeittain/metreittäin; Paneeli; Valmiiksi leikattu pala; Rulla; Muu
en: Fabric cut format: Band/strip (bellpull); Bolt; By the yard/meter; Panel; Precut piece; Roll; Other
vi: Định dạng cắt vải: Dải/băng (bellpull); Cuộn; Theo yard/mét; Mảnh khổ lớn; Mảnh cắt sẵn; Cuộn; Khác
tr: Kumaş kesim biçimi: Bant/şerit (çan ipi); Top; Yarda/metre cinsinden; Panel; Önceden kesilmiş parça; Rulo; Diğer